Utah statutes.
75-2-202.   Elective share -- Supplemental elective share amount -- Effect
of election on statutory benefits -- Nondomicilary.
(1)  The surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled in Utah has a right
of election, under the limitations and conditions stated in this part, to take
an elective-share amount equal to the value of 1/3 of the augmented estate.
(2) If the sum of the amounts described in Subsection 75-2-209(1), and that
part of the elective-share amount payable from the decedent's probate estate
and nonprobate transfers to others under Subsections 75-2-209(2) and (3) is
less than $25,000, the surviving spouse is entitled to a supplemental
elective-share amount equal to $25,000, minus the sum of the amounts described
in those sections.  The supplemental elective-share amount is payable from the
decedent's probate estate and from recipients of the decedent's nonprobate
transfers to others in the order of priority set forth in Subsections
75-2-209(2) and (3).
(3)  If the right of election is exercised by or on behalf of the surviving
spouse, the surviving spouse's homestead allowance, exempt property, and
family allowance, if any, are charged against, and are not in addition to, the
elective-share and supplemental elective-share amounts.
(4)  The right, if any, of the surviving spouse of a decedent who dies
domiciled outside Utah to take an elective share in property in Utah is
governed by the law of the decedent's domicile at death.
